Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.1971

Definition—"Beneficiary."

For the purposes of RCW 41.40.197, 41.40.1984, and 41.40.1986, "beneficiary" means a beneficiary under RCW 41.40.010 or 41.44.030, or both RCW 41.40.010 and 41.44.030.

[ 1995 c 345 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1995 c 345: See notes following RCW 41.32.489.